apertium-mrj-fin.mrj.lexc
LEXICON PERS-SG1
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg1%>%<nom%>:нь K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg1%>%<gen%>:ньӹн K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg1%>%<acc%>:ньӹм K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg1%>%<dat%>:лӓнем K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg1%>%<comp%>:ньлӓ K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg1%>%<com%>:ньге K ;

LEXICON PERS-SG2
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg2%>%<nom%>:нь K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg2%>%<gen%>:ньӹн K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg2%>%<acc%>:ньӹм K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg2%>%<dat%>:лӓнет K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg2%>%<comp%>:ньлӓ K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg2%>%<com%>:ньге K ;

LEXICON PERS-SG3
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg3%>%<nom%>: K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg3%>%<gen%>:%>н K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg3%>%<acc%>:%>м K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg3%>%<dat%>:%>лӓн K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg3%>%<comp%>:%>лӓ K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<sg3%>%<com%>:%>ге K ;

LEXICON PERS-PL1
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl1%>%<nom%>: K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl1%>%<gen%>:мнӓ%>н K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl1%>%<acc%>:мнӓ%>м K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl1%>%<dat%>:%>лӓннӓ K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl1%>%<comp%>:%>лӓ K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl1%>%<com%>:%>ге K ;

LEXICON PERS-PL2
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl2%>%<nom%>: K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl2%>%<gen%>:мдӓ%>н K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl2%>%<acc%>:мдӓ%>м K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl2%>%<dat%>:%>лӓндӓ K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl2%>%<comp%>:%>лӓ K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl2%>%<com%>:%>ге K ;

LEXICON PERS-PL3 !!= @CODE@ нӹнӹ:нӹнӹ
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl3%>%<nom%>: K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl3%>%<gen%>:%>н K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl3%>%<acc%>:%>м K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl3%>%<dat%>:%>лӓн K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl3%>%<comp%>:%>лӓ K ;
%<pron%>%<pers%>%<pl3%>%<com%>:%>ге K ;

LEXICON REFL !!= @CODE@ ӹшке:ӹшк
%<pron%>%<refl%>%<dep%>:е K ;
%<pron%>%<refl%>%<gen%>:ӹмӹ%>н K ;
%<pron%>%<refl%>%<acc%>:ӹмӹ%>м K ;
%<pron%>%<refl%>%<dat%>:ӹ%>лӓн K ;

!%<pron%>%<refl%>%<sg1%>%<nom%>:е K ;
%<pron%>%<refl%>%<sg1%>%<gen%>:ӹмемӹ%>н K ;
%<pron%>%<refl%>%<sg1%>%<acc%>:ӹмемӹ%>м K ;
%<pron%>%<refl%>%<sg1%>%<dat%>:ӹ%>лӓнем K ;

!%<pron%>%<refl%>%<sg2%>%<nom%>:е K ;
%<pron%>%<refl%>%<sg2%>%<gen%>:ӹметӹ%>н K ;
%<pron%>%<refl%>%<sg2%>%<acc%>:ӹметӹ%>м K ;
%<pron%>%<refl%>%<sg2%>%<dat%>:ӹ%>лӓнет K ;

!%<pron%>%<refl%>%<sg3%>%<nom%>:е K ;
%<pron%>%<refl%>%<sg3%>%<gen%>:ӹмжӹ%>н K ;
%<pron%>%<refl%>%<sg3%>%<acc%>:ӹмжӹ%>м K ;
%<pron%>%<refl%>%<sg3%>%<dat%>:ӹ%>лӓнжӹ K ;

!%<pron%>%<refl%>%<pl1%>%<nom%>:е K ;
%<pron%>%<refl%>%<pl1%>%<gen%>:ӹмнӓ%>н K ;
%<pron%>%<refl%>%<pl1%>%<acc%>:ӹмнӓ%>м K ;
%<pron%>%<refl%>%<pl1%>%<dat%>:ӹ%>лӓннӓ K ;

!%<pron%>%<refl%>%<pl2%>%<nom%>:е K ;
%<pron%>%<refl%>%<pl2%>%<gen%>:ӹмдӓ%>н K ;
%<pron%>%<refl%>%<pl2%>%<acc%>:ӹмдӓ%>м K ;
%<pron%>%<refl%>%<pl2%>%<dat%>:ӹ%>лӓндӓ K ;

!%<pron%>%<refl%>%<pl3%>%<nom%>:е K ;
%<pron%>%<refl%>%<pl3%>%<gen%>:ӹмӹшт%>н K ;
%<pron%>%<refl%>%<pl3%>%<acc%>:ӹмӹшт%>м K ;
%<pron%>%<refl%>%<pl3%>%<dat%>:ӹ%>лӓнӹштӹ K ;

LEXICON DEM-SG !!= @CODE@ тидӹ:ти
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<dep%>: # ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:дӹ K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:дӹ%>н K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:дӹ%>м K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:дӹ%>лӓн K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<comp%>:дӹ%>лӓ K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<sg%>%<com%>:дӹ%>ге K ;

%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:дӹ%>влӓ K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:дӹ%>влӓ%>н K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:дӹ%>влӓ%>м K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:дӹ%>влӓ%>лӓн K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<comp%>:дӹ%>влӓ%>лӓ K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<com%>:дӹ%>влӓ%>ге K ;

LEXICON DEM-PL !!= @CODE@ нинӹ:ни
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<dep%>: # ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:нӹ K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:нӹ%>н K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:нӹ%>м K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:нӹ%>лӓн K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<comp%>:нӹ%>лӓ K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<com%>:нӹ%>ге K ;
!! Plural pronoun with additional plural marking
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<pl%>%<nom%>:нӹ%>влӓ K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<pl%>%<gen%>:нӹ%>влӓ%>н K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<pl%>%<acc%>:нӹ%>влӓ%>м K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<pl%>%<dat%>:нӹ%>влӓ%>лӓн K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<pl%>%<comp%>:нӹ%>влӓ%>лӓ K ;
%<pron%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<pl%>%<com%>:нӹ%>влӓ%>ге K ;


LEXICON DemTag
%<dem%>%<adn%>: # ;
%<dem%>%<pron%>: Dem-Cx ;
!! What are these тӹдӹмӓт, тӹдӹлӓнӓт

LEXICON Dem-Cx
%<sg%>%<nom%>: K ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:%>н K ;
%<sg%>%<acc%>:%>м K ;
%<sg%>%<dat%>:%>лА1н K ;

%<pl%>%<nom%>:%>влӓ K ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:%>влӓ%>н K ;
%<pl%>%<acc%>:%>влӓ%>м K ;
%<pl%>%<dat%>:%>влӓ%>лА1н K ;





! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! !!!Proper noun inflection
!! ----

!! Hill Mari proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns

LEXICON PROP_
%<n%>%<prop%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON ACRONDELIMITER ! Here we need some kind of vowel harmony
    PROP_ ;
:%: PROP_ ;
:%- PROP_ ;
:%' PROP_ ;


!! !!Male given name for deriving patronyms 

! Андрей:Андре
LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-J-0Evich
%<orth_colloq%>:ич PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:евич PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:евна PROP_КУДО_PATRFEM ;
:й PROP_КАЛ_MAL ;

LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-IJ-Y0Evich
%<orth_colloq%>:ьич PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:ьевич PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:ьевна PROP_КУДО_PATRFEM ;
:ий PROP_КАЛ_MAL ;

LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-IJ-I0Evich
%<orth_colloq%>:ьич PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:иевич PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:иевна PROP_КУДО_PATRFEM ;
:ий PROP_КАЛ_MAL ;

LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-Y-0Evich
%<orth_colloq%>:ич PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:евич PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:евна PROP_КУДО_PATRFEM ;
:ь PROP_КАЛ_MAL ;

!! Вили:Вил
LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-I-YEvich
%<orth_colloq%>:ич PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:ьевич PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:ьевна PROP_КУДО_PATRFEM ;
:и PROP_КАЛ_MAL ;

LEXICON PropNameMaleDer-Ovich
%<orth_colloq%>:ыч PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:ович PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL ;
:овна PROP_КУДО_PATRFEM ;
 PROP_КАЛ_MAL ;

!! !!Female Given names 

LEXICON Prop-kal_fem
%<n%>%<prop%>%<fem%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON Prop-lak_fem
%<n%>%<prop%>%<fem%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON Prop-kit_fem
%<n%>%<prop%>%<fem%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON Prop-osh_fem
%<n%>%<prop%>%<fem%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON Prop-teshte_fem
 Prop-pango_fem ;

LEXICON Prop-tinge_fem
 Prop-pango_fem ;

LEXICON Prop-pango_fem
%<n%>%<prop%>%<fem%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON Prop-kudo_fem
%<n%>%<prop%>%<fem%>: N_01 ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Russian type Surnames
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! Абдеев:Абдеев
LEXICON Deriv-RUS-В_SURMAL
: PROP_КАЛ_SURMAL ;
:а PROP_КУДО_SURFEM ;

!! Багрий:Багр
LEXICON Deriv-RUS-ИЙ_SURMAL
:ий PROP_КАЛ_SURMAL ;
:яя PROP_КУДО_SURFEM ;

!! Аморский:Аморск
LEXICON Deriv-RUS-КИЙ_SURMAL
:ий PROP_КАЛ_SURMAL ;
:ая PROP_КУДО_SURFEM ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-ОЙ_SURMAL
:ой PROP_КАЛ_SURMAL ;
:ая PROP_КУДО_SURFEM ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-ЫЙ_SURMAL
:ый PROP_КАЛ_SURMAL ;
:ая PROP_КУДО_SURFEM ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-АН_SURMAL
 Deriv-RUS-В_SURMAL ;

LEXICON Deriv-RUS-ИН_SURMAL
 Deriv-RUS-В_SURMAL ;



LEXICON CYRL-CONS_SUR
 PROP_КАЛ_SUR ;

LEXICON CYRL-Т_SUR
 PROP_КИТ_SUR ;

LEXICON CYRL-К_SUR
 PROP_ЛАК_SUR ;

LEXICON CYRL-SIBILANT_SUR
 PROP_ОШ_SUR ;

LEXICON CYRL-VOW_SUR
 PROP_КУДО_SUR ;

LEXICON CYRL-А_SUR
 PROP_КУДО_SUR ;

LEXICON PROP_КАЛ_FEM
%<n%>%<prop%>%<fem%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON PROP_КАЛ_MAL
%<n%>%<prop%>%<mal%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON PROP_КАЛ_SURMAL
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sur%>%<mal%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON PROP_КАЛ_SUR
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sur%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON PROP_КИТ_FEM
%<n%>%<prop%>%<fem%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON PROP_КИТ_MAL
%<n%>%<prop%>%<mal%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON PROP_КИТ_SUR
 PROP_КАЛ_SUR ;

LEXICON PROP_КУДО_FEM
%<n%>%<prop%>%<fem%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON PROP_КУДО_MAL
%<n%>%<prop%>%<mal%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON PROP_КУДО_PATRFEM
%<n%>%<prop%>%<patr%>%<fem%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON PROP_КУДО_SUR
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sur%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON PROP_КУДО_SURFEM
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sur%>%<fem%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON PROP_ЛАК_MAL
%<n%>%<prop%>%<mal%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON PROP_ЛАК_SUR
 PROP_КАЛ_SUR ;

LEXICON PROP_ОШ_FEM
%<n%>%<prop%>%<fem%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON PROP_ОШ_MAL
%<n%>%<prop%>%<mal%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL
%<n%>%<prop%>%<patr%>%<mal%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON PROP_ОШ_SUR
%<n%>%<prop%>%<sur%>: N_01 ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!! PLACE NAMES FROM TEMPLATES !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON PROP_КАЛ_PLC
%<n%>%<prop%>%<plc%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON PROP_КИТ_PLC
%<n%>%<prop%>%<plc%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON PROP_ОШ_PLC
%<n%>%<prop%>%<plc%>: N_01 ;

LEXICON pronouns
мӓ:мӓ PERS-PL1   ; !"me"
мӹнь:мӹ PERS-SG1   ; !"minä"
нинӹ:нинӹ DEM-SG   ; !"nämä"
нӹнӹ:нӹнӹ PERS-PL3   ; !"he"
нӹнӹ:нӹнӹ DEM-PL   ; !"nuo"
седӹ:седӹ DEM-SG   ; !"tuo"
тидӹ:ти DEM-SG   ; !"tämä"
тӓ:тӓ PERS-PL2   ; !"te"
тӹдӹ:тӹдӹ PERS-SG3   ; !"hän"
тӹдӹ:тӹ DEM-SG   ; !"tuo"
тӹнь:тӹ PERS-SG2   ; !""
ӹшке:ӹшк REFL   ; !"itse"
LEXICON urj-Cyrl-ProperNouns
Босых:Босых CYRL-CONS_SUR  ; !"Z"
Брожко:Брожко CYRL-VOW_SUR  ; !"Z"
Брухтий:Брухт Deriv-RUS-ИЙ_SURMAL  ; !"Z"
Буркот:Буркот CYRL-Т_SUR  ; !"Z"
Вайцехович:Вайцехович CYRL-SIBILANT_SUR  ; !"Z"
Валебный:Валебн Deriv-RUS-ЫЙ_SURMAL  ; !"Z"
Волчек:Волчек CYRL-К_SUR  ; !"Z"
Восковский:Восковск Deriv-RUS-КИЙ_SURMAL  ; !"Z"
Гаевой:Гаев Deriv-RUS-ОЙ_SURMAL  ; !"Z"
Гаман:Гаман Deriv-RUS-АН_SURMAL  ; !"Z"
Гиршберг:Гиршберг CYRL-CONS_SUR  ; !"Z"
Говзан:Говзан Deriv-RUS-АН_SURMAL  ; !"Z"
Говорко:Говорко CYRL-VOW_SUR  ; !"Z"
Голивец:Голивец CYRL-SIBILANT_SUR  ; !"Z"
Гопций:Гопц Deriv-RUS-ИЙ_SURMAL  ; !"Z"
Грот:Грот CYRL-Т_SUR  ; !"Z"
Давлетов:Давлетов Deriv-RUS-В_SURMAL  ; !"Z"
Дышлевой:Дышлев Deriv-RUS-ОЙ_SURMAL  ; !"Z"
Еребакан:Еребакан Deriv-RUS-АН_SURMAL  ; !"Z"
Ерин:Ерин Deriv-RUS-ИН_SURMAL  ; !"Z"
Жарик:Жарик CYRL-К_SUR  ; !"Z"
Заболотный:Заболотн Deriv-RUS-ЫЙ_SURMAL  ; !"Z"
Затинацкий:Затинацк Deriv-RUS-КИЙ_SURMAL  ; !"Z"
Зюба:Зюба CYRL-А_SUR  ; !"Z"
Козий:Коз Deriv-RUS-ИЙ_SURMAL  ; !"Z"
Куценко:Куценко CYRL-VOW_SUR  ; !"Z"
Могила:Могила CYRL-А_SUR  ; !"Z"
Моржеедов:Моржеедов Deriv-RUS-В_SURMAL  ; !"Z"
Пецевич:Пецевич CYRL-SIBILANT_SUR  ; !"Z"
Пиманин:Пиманин Deriv-RUS-ИН_SURMAL  ; !"Z"
Польской:Польск Deriv-RUS-ОЙ_SURMAL  ; !"Z"
Поповский:Поповск Deriv-RUS-КИЙ_SURMAL  ; !"Z"
Семикопный:Семикопн Deriv-RUS-ЫЙ_SURMAL  ; !"Z"
Фирсов:Фирсов Deriv-RUS-В_SURMAL  ; !"Z"
Фисун:Фисун CYRL-CONS_SUR  ; !"Z"
Ченчик:Ченчик CYRL-К_SUR  ; !"Z"
Эйсмонт:Эйсмонт CYRL-Т_SUR  ; !"Z"
Юффа:Юффа CYRL-А_SUR  ; !"Z"
Яшечкин:Яшечкин Deriv-RUS-ИН_SURMAL  ; !"Z"
Аса:Аса PROP_КУДО_MAL  ; !"Z"
Афиноген:Афиноген PropNameMaleDer-Ovich   ; !"Z"
Боаз:Боаз PROP_ОШ_MAL  ; !"Z"
Геральд:Геральд PropNameMaleDer-Ovich   ; !"Z"
Иисус:Иисус PROP_ОШ_MAL  ; !"Z"
Иосафат:Иосафат PROP_КИТ_MAL  ; !"Z"
Исайя:Исайя PROP_КУДО_MAL  ; !"Z"
Искариот:Искариот PROP_КИТ_SUR  ; !"Z"
Леббей:Леббей PROP_КАЛ_MAL  ; !"Z"
Мансур:Мансур PropNameMaleDer-Ovich   ; !"Z"
Михаил:Михайловна PROP_КУДО_PATRFEM  ; !"Z"
Павол:Павлович PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL   ; !"Z"
Павол:Павловна PROP_КУДО_PATRFEM   ; !"Z"
Перес:Перес PROP_ОШ_MAL  ; !"Z"
Пётр:Петрович PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL   ; !"Z"
Пётр:Петровна PROP_КУДО_PATRFEM   ; !"Z"
Садок:Садок PROP_ЛАК_MAL  ; !"Z"
Салатил:Салатил PROP_КАЛ_MAL  ; !"Z"
Сослан:Сослан PropNameMaleDer-Ovich   ; !"Z"
Урия:Урия PROP_КУДО_MAL  ; !"Z"
Христос:Христос PROP_ОШ_SUR  ; !"Z"
Азур:Азур PROP_КАЛ_MAL  ; !"Z"
Аркадий:Аркад PropNameMaleDer-IJ-I0Evich   ; !"Z"
Виталий:Витал PropNameMaleDer-IJ-I0Evich   ; !"Z"
Георгий:Георги PropNameMaleDer-J-0Evich   ; !"Z"
Григорий:Григор PropNameMaleDer-IJ-Y0Evich   ; !"Z"
Евсевьевич:Евсевьевич PROP_ОШ_PATRMAL  ; !"Z"
Еремей:Ереме PropNameMaleDer-J-0Evich   ; !"Z"
Игнатий:Игнат PropNameMaleDer-IJ-Y0Evich   ; !"Z"
Клавдий:Клавд PropNameMaleDer-IJ-I0Evich   ; !"Z"
Левкий:Левки PropNameMaleDer-J-0Evich   ; !"Z"
Прокопий:Прокоп PropNameMaleDer-IJ-Y0Evich   ; !"Z"
Прокофий:Прокоф PropNameMaleDer-IJ-Y0Evich   ; !"Z"
Сергей:Серге PropNameMaleDer-J-0Evich   ; !"Z"
Феодосий:Феодос PropNameMaleDer-IJ-I0Evich   ; !"Z"
Франць:Франц PropNameMaleDer-Y-0Evich   ; !"Z"
Габриели:Габриел PropNameMaleDer-I-YEvich   ; !"Z"
Игори:Игор PropNameMaleDer-I-YEvich   ; !"Z"
Наили:Наил PropNameMaleDer-I-YEvich   ; !"Z"
Юри:Юр PropNameMaleDer-I-YEvich   ; !"Z"
Власта:Власта PROP_КУДО_FEM  ; !"Z"
Катюша:Катюша PROP_КУДО_FEM  ; !"Z"
Лорис:Лорис PROP_ОШ_FEM  ; !"Z"
Любовь:Любовь PROP_КАЛ_FEM  ; !"Z"
Олесь:Олесь PROP_ОШ_FEM  ; !"Z"
Рахав:Рахав PROP_КАЛ_FEM  ; !"Z"
Рут:Рут PROP_КИТ_FEM  ; !"Z"
Фидель:Фидель PROP_КАЛ_FEM  ; !"Z"
Эрна:Эрна PROP_КУДО_FEM  ; !"Z"
Янис:Янис PROP_ОШ_FEM  ; !"Z"
Египет:Египет PROP_КИТ_PLC  ; !"Z"
Ерусалим:Ерусалим PROP_КАЛ_PLC  ; !"Z"
Израиль:Израиль PROP_КАЛ_PLC  ; !"Z"
Китай:Китай PROP_КАЛ_PLC  ; !"Z"
